sv: PCB-ytfinish: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolytisk nickel/guld; Guldplätering; HASL; Nedsänkt silver; Nedsänkt tenn; Blyfri HASL; OSP; Övrigt
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolytický nikel/zlato; Zlatenie; HASL; Ponorné striebro; Ponorný cín; Bezolovnatý HASL; OSP; Iné
el: Φινίρισμα επιφάνειας PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Ηλεκτρολυτικό νικέλιο/χρυσός; Επιχρύσωση; HASL; Εμβάπτιση αργύρου; Εμβάπτιση κασσίτερου; HASL χωρίς μόλυβδο; OSP; Άλλο
fi: Piirilevyn pintaviimeistely: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolyyttinen nikkeli/kulta; Kultapinnoitus; HASL; Upotettu hopea; Upotettu tina; Lyijytön HASL; OSP; Muu
cs: Povrchová úprava DPS: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolytický nikl/zlato; Pozlacení; HASL; Ponorné stříbro; Ponorný cín; Bezolovnatý HASL; OSP; Jiné
ko: PCB 표면 마감: ENEPIG; ENIG; 전해 니켈/금; 금도금; HASL; 침지 은; 침지 주석; 무연 HASL; OSP; 기타
zh-TW: PCB 表面處理: ENEPIG; ENIG; 電鍍鎳/金; 鍍金; HASL; 浸銀; 浸錫; 無鉛 HASL; OSP; 其他
zh-CN: PCB 表面处理: ENEPIG; ENIG; 电镀镍/金; 镀金; HASL; 化学银; 化学锡; 无铅 HASL; OSP; 其他
fr: Finition de surface du circuit imprimé: ENEPIG; ENIG; Nickel/or électrolytique; Plaquage or; HASL; Argent par immersion; Étain par immersion; HASL sans plomb; OSP; Autre
hu: PCB-felületi bevonat: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolitikus nikkel/arany; Aranyozás; HASL; Merített ezüst; Merített ón; Ólommentes HASL; OSP; Egyéb
ja: PCB表面仕上げ: ENEPIG; ENIG; 電解ニッケル/金; 金メッキ; HASL; 浸漬銀; 浸漬スズ; 鉛フリーHASL; OSP; その他
hr-HR: Završna obrada površine PCB-a: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolitički nikal/zlato; Pozlata; HASL; Uranjanje u srebro; Uranjanje u kositar; Bezolovni HASL; OSP; Ostalo
tr: PCB yüzey kaplaması: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolitik nikel/altın; Altın kaplama; HASL; Daldırma gümüş; Daldırma kalay; Kurşunsuz HASL; OSP; Diğer
it: Finitura superficiale PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Nichel/oro elettrolitico; Placcatura in oro; HASL; Argento per immersione; Stagno per immersione; HASL senza piombo; OSP; Altro
pl: Wykończenie powierzchni PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Galwaniczny nikiel/złoto; Złocenie; HASL; Srebrzenie immersyjne; Cynowanie immersyjne; Bezołowiowy HASL; OSP; Inne
lt-LT: PCB paviršiaus apdaila: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolitinis nikelis/auksas; Auksavimas; HASL; Panardinimo sidabras; Panardinimo alavas; Bešvinis HASL; OSP; Kita
nl: PCB oppervlakte afwerking: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolytisch nikkel/goud; Goudplating; HASL; Immersiezilver; Immersietin; Loodvrije HASL; OSP; Andere
th: การเคลือบพื้นผิว PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; นิกเกิล/ทองแบบอิเล็กโทรไลต์; ชุบทอง; HASL; จุ่มเงิน; จุ่มดีบุก; HASL ปลอดสารตะกั่ว; OSP; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Повърхностно покритие на печатната платка: ENEPIG; ENIG; Електролитен никел/злато; Позлатяване; HASL; Потапяне в сребро; Потапяне в калай; Безоловен HASL; OSP; Други
en: PCB surface finish: ENEPIG; ENIG; Electrolytic Nickel/Gold; Gold plating; HASL; Immersion Silver; Immersion Tin; Lead-free HASL; OSP; Other
nb: PCB-overflatebehandling: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolytisk nikkel/gull; Gullbelegging; HASL; Nedsenkningssølv; Nedsenkningstinn; Blyfri HASL; OSP; Annet
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện bề mặt PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Niken/vàng điện phân; Mạ vàng; HASL; Bạc nhúng; Thiếc nhúng; HASL không chì; OSP; Khác
da: PCB-overfladefinish: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolytisk nikkel/guld; Guldbelægning; HASL; Nedsænkningssølv; Nedsænkningstin; Blyfri HASL; OSP; Andet
ru: Покрытие поверхности печатной платы: ENEPIG; ENIG; Электролитический никель/золото; Золотое покрытие; HASL; Иммерсионное серебро; Иммерсионное олово; Бессвинцовый HASL; OSP; Другой
pt-BR: Acabamento de superfície da PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Níquel/ouro eletrolítico; Banho de ouro; HASL; Prata por imersão; Estanho por imersão; HASL sem chumbo; OSP; Outro
pt-PT: Acabamento de superfície da PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Níquel/ouro eletrolítico; Banho de ouro; HASL; Prata por imersão; Estanho por imersão; HASL sem chumbo; OSP; Outro
ro-RO: Finisaj suprafață PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Nichel/aur electrolitic; Placare cu aur; HASL; Argint prin imersie; Cositor prin imersie; HASL fără plumb; OSP; Altele
de: Leiterplatten-Oberflächenveredelung: ENEPIG; ENIG; Galvanisches Nickel/Gold; Vergoldung; HAL; Chemisch Silber; Chemisch Zinn; Bleifreies HAL; OSP; Sonstiges
es: Acabado de superficie de PCB: ENEPIG; ENIG; Níquel/oro electrolítico; Baño de oro; HASL; Plata de inmersión; Estaño de inmersión; HASL sin plomo; OSP; Otros
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava tiskane plošče: ENEPIG; ENIG; Elektrolitski nikelj/zlato; Pozlatitev; HASL; Imerzijsko srebro; Imerzijski kositer; HASL brez svinca; OSP; Drugo